South Dakota, session 2026, HB1079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-12-5.1 be AMENDED:
32-12-5.1. The Department of Public Safety may deny the issuance of a motor
vehicle operator's license, motorcycle operator's license, restricted minor's permit,
motorcycle restricted minor's permit, instruction permit, or motorcycle instruction permit
to any individual who has experienced convulsions, seizures, or blackouts, until the
individual has experienced a period of twelve months without any such episode. However,
upon only if the applicant has been diagnosed, by a licensed physician, as having a chronic
medical condition that could interfere with the operation of a motor vehicle. Any person
with a physical condition that would detract from the ability to safely operate a motor
vehicle must show, through examination by a personal physician, that the person has the
ability to do so. Upon receipt of a statement signed by the applicant that the applicant's
condition is adequately controlled by medication, the applicant is continuing to take
medication, and the applicant is under the care of a physician, the Department of Public
Safety may issue a temporary permit to the applicant. This temporary permit is subject
to the provisions of § 32-12-36 and is reviewable by the department every six months, or
until the applicant has gone a period of twelve months without any episode.
If the department Department of Public Safety has reasonable grounds to believe
that an applicant's medical condition may affect the safe operation of a motor vehicle or
motorcycle, the department department may require the applicant to submit to the
department the results of a medical examination or physician's a licensed health care
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1079C 2 1079
practitioner's certification attesting to the applicant's fitness to operate a motor vehicle in
order to receive the temporary permit.
The department may deny the issuance of a motor vehicle operator's license,
motorcycle operator's license, restricted minor's permit, motorcycle restricted minor's
permit, instruction permit, or motorcycle instruction permit only if the applicant has been
diagnosed, by a licensed health care practitioner, as having a chronic medical condition
that could interfere with the operation of a motor vehicle.
Any person with a physical condition that would detract from the ability to safely
operate a motor vehicle must show, through examination by a licensed health care
practitioner, that the person has the ability to do so. Upon receipt of a statement signed
by the licensed health care practitioner that the applicant is under the practitioner's care,
and that the condition is adequately controlled, the department may issue the license or
permit to the applicant.

Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.